District of Columbia statutes.
50-2201.25

Issuance of congressional tags.

After June 28, 1944, no part of any District of Columbia appropriations shall be available for any expense for or incident to the issuance of congressional tags except to those persons set out in § 50-2201.03, including the Speaker and the Vice President.

June 28, 1944, 58 Stat. 532, ch. 300, § 8
1981 Ed., § 40-708.
1973 Ed., § 40-603b.